Louisiana, session 2026, HB1253.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:19(E)(4) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§19. Records of a coroner; autopsy photographs, video, and other visual images
* * *
E. Coroner death investigation documents shall include the following:
* * *
(4) A post-mortem forensic medical examination report, referred to as the
"autopsy report", may include an external examination only, an external examination
with toxicology, toxicology only, or an autopsy with supporting laboratory
evaluation. The post-mortem forensic medical examination report is a document that
is the work product of the coroner that contains the name of the decedent, address,
date of birth, age, sex, and race of the decedent, date and time of death, place of
death, date and time of autopsy, when applicable, name of the doctor performing the
autopsy and names of all persons present at the autopsy, and information regarding
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1253 ENROLLED
the autopsy, including whether the autopsy was requested or performed by operation
of law, a listing of the physical findings of the autopsy, a summary in narrative form
of the medical findings and conclusions, toxicology, histology, and radiology
findings, when applicable, and the cause and manner of death. The post-mortem
forensic medical examination report shall document any organs of the deceased
retained pursuant to R.S. 13:5713(B)(4)(b). The post-mortem forensic medical
examination report is not a public document except as provided in Paragraph (6) of
this Subsection, or if ordered opened to the public by a court of competent
jurisdiction. However, it shall be made available at no charge to the appropriate law
enforcement agencies as requested and is subject to subpoena. The coroner shall
provide one copy of this document upon request by the spouse, parent, sibling, child,
grandchild, niece, nephew, aunt, or uncle of the decedent, or the next of kin pursuant
to R.S. 8:655(A) and one copy of this document upon request by the decedent's
physician. The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to the medical records
of the decedent or any records generated by any public entity other than the coroner
and those records shall be obtained from the entity generating them in accordance
with other applicable provisions of law.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Section 3. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Gracey Claire Rushing
Act" in memory of a young child whose passing in 2009 highlighted the need for improved
safeguards in the treatment of decedents' remains.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.